Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TWIN CITIES R!SE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for performance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8747, to Twin Cities R!SE to provide training to individuals facing barriers to employment. This appropriation is onetime and available until June 30, 2028. new text end